Hawaii statutes.
§501-152 Certificate of judgment for
defendant. At any time after final judgment in favor of the defendant, or
other disposition of any case in which a memorandum has been registered as
provided in section 501-151, a certificate of the clerk stating the manner of
the disposal thereof shall be entitled to registration. [L 1903, c 56, §81; RL
1925, §3270; RL 1935, §5079; RL 1945, §12679; RL 1955, §342-79; HRS §501-152;
am L 1972, c 91, §1(bb)]

Case Notes

Pursuant to this section, §501-151, and TSA International,
the circuit court has jurisdiction to expunge a lis pendens originally recorded
in the land court and thus did not err when it asserted jurisdiction over the
case. 101 H. 81, 63 P.3d 389.

The circuit court properly granted defendant's motion to
expunge the lis pendens where plaintiff's application for lis pendens did not
seek to obtain title to or possession of the real property at issue, and thus
was not valid. 101 H. 81, 63 P.3d 389.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next